da: EV-batteritype: Flow; Bly-syre; Lithium-luft (Li-air); Lithium-ion (Li-ion); Lithium-svovl (Li-S); Lithium-titanat (Li-Ti); Nikkel-cadmium (Ni-Cd); Nikkel-metalhydrid (NiMH); Natrium-ion (Na-ion); Fast tilstand; Ultra-kondensator; Andet
zh-TW: 電動汽車電池類型: 液流; 鉛酸; 鋰空氣 (Li-air); 鋰離子（Li-ion）; 鋰硫 (Li-S); 鈦酸鋰 (Li-Ti); 鎳鎘 (Ni-Cd); 鎳氫 (NiMH); 鈉離子 (Na-ion); 固體狀態; 超大容量電容器; 其他
sv: Batterityp för elfordon: Flöde; Bly-syra; Lithium-luft (Li-air); Litiumjon (Li-jon); Litium-svavel (Li-S); Litiumtitanat (Li-Ti); Nickelkadmium (Ni-Cd); Nickelmetallhydrid (NiMH); Natriumjon (Na-ion); Fast tillstånd; Superkondensator; Övrigt
es: Tipo de batería EV: Flujo; Ácido de plomo; Litio-aire (Li-air); Ión-litio (Li-ion); Litio-azufre (Li-S); Litio-titanato (Li-Ti); Níquel-cadmio (Ni-Cd); Níquel-hidruro metálico (NiMH); Ión de sodio (Na-ion); Estado sólido; Supercondensador; Otros
sk-SK: Typ batérie elektromobilov: Prietok; Olovený akumulátor; Lítium-vzduch (Li-air); Lítium-iónový (Li-ion); Lítium-sírový (Li-S); Titaničitan lítny (Li-Ti); Nikel-kadmium (Ni-Cd); Hydrid niklu a kovu (NiMH); Sodík-ión (Na-ión); Pevný stav; Ultra-kondenzátor; Iné
nb: Elbil-batteritype: Strøm; Blysyre; Litium-luft (Li-luft); Litium-ion (Li-ion); Litium-svovel (Li-S); Litium-titanat (Li-Ti); Nikkel-kadmium (Ni-Cd); Nikkelmetallhydrid (NiMH); Natrium-ion (Na-ion); Fast form; Ultrakondensator; Annet
th: ประเภทแบตเตอรี่ EV: โฟลว์; ตะกั่วกรด; ลิเธียม-แอร์ (Li-air); ลิเธียมไอออน (Li-ion); ลิเธียม-กำมะถัน (Li-S); ลิเธียม-ไททาเนต (Li-Ti); นิกเกิล-แคดเมียม (NiCd); นิกเกิลเมทัลไฮไดรด์ (NiMH); โซเดียม-ไอออน (Na-ion); โซลิดสเตต; ตัวเก็บประจุยิ่งยวด; อื่นๆ
nl: EV-batterijtype: Flow; Loodzuur; Lithium-lucht (Li-air); Lithium-ion (Li-ion); Lithium-zwavel (Li-S); Lithium-titanaat (Li-Ti); Nikkel-cadmium (Ni-Cd); Nikkel-metaalhydride (NiMH); Natrium-ion (Na-ion); Solid-state; Supercondensator; Andere
ro-RO: Tip baterie EV: Tip flow; Plumb-acid; Litiu-aer (Li-aer); Litiu-ion (Li-ion); Litiu-sulf (Li-S); Titanat de litiu (Li-Ti); Nichel-cadmiu (Ni-Cd); Nichel-metal-hidrură (NiMH); Ioni de sodiu (Na-ion); Stare solidă; Ultra-condensator; Altele
lt-LT: Elektrinės transporto priemonės akumuliatoriaus tipas: Srautinis; Švino rūgštis; Litis-oras (Li-air); Ličio jonai (Li-ion); Ličio siera (Li-S); Ličio titanatas (Li-Ti); Nikelio kadmis (NiCd); Nikelio metalo hidridas (NiMH); Natrio jonai (Na-ion); Kietojo kūno; Superkondensatorius; Kita
ru: Тип аккумуляторов электротранспорта: Поток; Свинцово-кислотный; Литий-воздушный (Li-air); Литий-ионный (Li-ion); Литий-серный (Li-S); Литий-титанатный (Li-Ti); Никель-кадмиевый (Ni-Cd); Никель-металлгидридный (NiMH); Натрий-ионный (Na-ion); Твердотельный; Ультраконденсатор; Другой
hr-HR: Vrsta baterije za električna vozila: Protok; Olovo-kiselina; Litij-zrak (Li-zrak); Litij-ion (Li-ion); Litij-sumpor (Li-S); Litij-titanat (Li-Ti); Nikal-kadmij (NiCd); Nikal-metal hidrid (NiMH); Natrij-ion (Na-ion); Solid-state; Ultra-capacitor; Ostalo
en: EV battery type: Flow; Lead-acid; Lithium-air (Li-air); Lithium-ion (Li-ion); Lithium-sulfur (Li-S); Lithium-titanate (Li-Ti); Nickel-cadmium (Ni-Cd); Nickel-metal hydride (NiMH); Sodium-ion (Na-ion); Solid-state; Ultra-capacitor; Other
pt-BR: Tipo da bateria EV: Fluxo; Chumbo ácido; Bateria de lítio-ar (Li-air); Íon de lítio (íon de lítio); Bateria de lítio-enxofre (Li-S); Titanato de lítio (Li-Ti); Níquel-cádmio (NiCd); Hidreto metálico de níquel (NiMH); Íon de sódio (íon Na); Estado sólido; Ultracapacitor; Outro
zh-CN: EV 电池类型: 液流; 铅酸; 锂空气 (Li-air); 锂离子（Li-ion）; 锂硫 (Li-S); 钛酸锂 (Li-Ti); 镍镉 (Ni-Cd); 镍氢 (NiMH); 钠离子 (Na-ion); 固态; 超级电容; 其他
vi: Loại pin xe điện: Luồng; Axit chì; Lithium-không khí (Li-air); Lithium-ion (Li-ion); Liti-lưu huỳnh (Li-S); Liti-titanate (Li-Ti); Niken-cadmium (Ni-Cd); Niken-hydride kim loại (NiMH); Ion natri (Na-ion); Thể rắn; Siêu tụ điện; Khác
pt-PT: Tipo de bateria EV: Fluxo; Chumbo ácido; Lítio-ar (Li-air); Íon de lítio (Li-ion); Lítio-enxofre (Li-S); Lítio-titanato (Li-Ti); Níquel-cádmio (Ni-Cd); Hidreto de níquel metálico (NiMH); Iões de sódio (Na-ion); Estado sólido; Ultracondensador; Outro
tr: Elektrikli araç pil türü: Akış; Kurşun-asit; Lityum hava (Li-hava); Lityum-iyon (Li-iyon); Lityum kükürt (Li-S); Lityum titanat (Li-Ti); Nikel kadmiyum (Ni-Cd); Nikel-metal hidrit (NiMH); Sodyum iyon (Na iyonu); Katı hal; Ultra kapasitör; Diğer
de: Typ des Elektrofahrzeugakkus: Flow; Blei-Säure; Lithium-Luft (Li-Air); Lithium-Ionen (Li-Ion); Lithium-Schwefel (LiS); Lithiumtitanat (LiTi); Nickel-Cadmium (NiCd); Nickel-Metallhydrid (NiMH); Natriumionen (NaIon); Festkörper; Ultrakondensator; Sonstiges
ja: EVバッテリーの種類: フロー; 鉛酸; リチウム空気 (Li-air); リチウムイオン (Li-ion); リチウム硫黄 (Li-S); チタン酸リチウム (Li-Ti); ニッケルカドミウム (Ni-Cd); ニッケル水素 (NiMH); ナトリウムイオン (Na-ion); ソリッドステート; ウルトラキャパシタ; その他
cs: Typ baterie EV: Průtoková; Olověné; Lithium-vzduch (Li-air); Lithium-iontové (Li-ion); Lithium-síra (Li-S); Lithium-titanát (Li-Ti); Nikl-kadmium (Ni-Cd); Nikl-metal hydrid (NiMH); Sodík-iont (Na-ion); Solid-state; Ultrakondenzátor; Jiné
it: Tipo di batteria EV: Flusso; Piombo acido; Litio-aria (Li-aria); Ioni di litio (Li-ion); Litio-zolfo (Li-S); Litio-titanato (Li-Ti); Nichel-cadmio (Ni-Cd); Nichel-metallo idruro (NiMH); Sodio-ione (Na-ion); Stato solido; Ultracondensatore; Altro
bg-BG: Вид на батерията за ЕПС: Поточна; Оловно-киселинна; Литий-въздух (Li-air); Литиево-йонна (Li-ion); Литиево-сярна (Li-S); Литиево-титанатна (Li-Ti); Никел-кадмий (Ni-Cd); Никел-металхидрид (NiMH); Натриев йон (Na-ion); Твърдотелна; Ултракондензатор; Други
sl-SI: Vrsta akumulatorja v električnem vozilu: Pretočna; Svinčen akumulator; Litij-zrak (Li-air); Litij-ion (Li-ion); Litij-žveplo (Li-S); Litijev titanat (Li-Ti); Nikelj-kadmij (Ni-Cd); Nikelj-metal hidrid (NiMH); Natrij-ion (Na-ion); Trdni elektrolit; Ultra-kondenzator; Drugo
pl: Typ akumulatora EV: Przepływowa; Kwas ołowiowy; Litowo-powietrzny (Li-air); Litowo-jonowa (Li-ion); Litowo-siarkowy (Li-S); Litowo-tytanowy (Li-Ti); Niklowo-kadmowy (Ni-Cd); Niklowo-metalowo-wodorkowa (NiMH); Sodowo-jonowy (Na-ion); Solid-state; Ultrakondensator; Inne
fi: EV-akkutyyppi: Virtaus; Lyijyhappo; Litium-ilma (Li-air); Litiumioni (Li-ion); Litium-rikki (Li-S); Litium-titanaatti (Li-Ti); Nikkeli-kadmium (NiCd); Nikkeli-metallihydridi (NiMH); Natrium-ioni (Na-ioni); Solid-state; Ultrakondensaattori; Muu
ko: EV 배터리 유형: 흐름; 납산; 리튬-에어(Li-air); 리튬 이온(Li-ion); 리튬황(Li-S); 티탄산 리튬(Li-Ti); 니켈 카드뮴(Ni-Cd); 니켈수소(NiMH); 나트륨 이온(Na-ion); 전고체; 울트라 커패시터; 기타
el: Τύπος μπαταρίας EV: Ροή; Μολύβδου-οξέος; Λιθίου-αέρα (Li-air); Ιόντων λιθίου (Li-ion); Λιθίου-θείου (Li-S); Τιτανικού λιθίου (Li-Ti); Νικελίου-καδμίου (Ni-Cd); Νικελίου-υδρογονωμένου μετάλλου (NiMH); Ιόντων νατρίου (Na-ion); Στερεάς κατάστασης; Υπερ-πυκνωτής; Άλλο
fr: Type de batterie de VE: Couler; Plomb-acide; Lithium-air (Li-air); Lithium-ion (Li-ion); Lithium-soufre (Li-S); Titanate de lithium (Li-Ti); Nickel-cadmium (Ni-Cd); Nickel-hydrure métallique (NiMH); Sodium-ion (Na-ion); État solide; Ultra-condensateur; Autre
hu: Elektromos jármű akkumulátorának típusa: Folyadékáramos; Ólomsavas; Lítium-levegő (Li-air); Lítium-ion (Li-ion); Lítium-kén (Li-S); Lítium-titanát (Li-Ti); Nikkel-kadmium (Ni-Cd); Nikkel-metál-hidrid (NiMH); Nátrium-ion (Na-ion); Szilárdtest; Ultrakondenzátor; Egyéb